nl: Geroosterde mout verwerkingstype: Zwarte mout; Chocolademout; Ontbitterde zwarte mout; Ontkaf (Carafa-stijl); Ontkafte geroosterde tarwe (midnight wheat-stijl); Bleke chocolademout; Geroosterde gerst (ongemout); Geroosterde rogge; Geroosterde tarwe; Overige
fr: Type de traitement du malt torréfié: Malt noir; Malt chocolat; Malt noir désamérisé; Décortiqué (type Carafa); Blé torréfié décortiqué (type Midnight Wheat); Malt chocolat pâle; Orge torréfiée (non maltée); Seigle torréfié; Blé torréfié; Autre
hu: Pörkölt maláta feldolgozási típusa: Fekete maláta; Csokoládémaláta; Keserűségmentes fekete maláta; Hántolt (Carafa típusú); Hántolt pörkölt búza (éjféli búza típusú); Világos csokoládémaláta; Pörkölt árpa (malátázatlan); Pörkölt rozs; Pörkölt búza; Egyéb
nb: Behandlingstype for ristet malt: Svartmalt; Sjokolademalt; Avbitret svartmalt; Avskallet (Carafa-stil); Avskallet røstet hvete (midnight wheat-stil); Lys sjokolademalt; Røstet bygg (umaltet); Røstet rug; Røstet hvete; Annet
el: Τύπος επεξεργασίας καβουρδισμένης βύνης: Μαύρη βύνη; Βύνη σοκολάτας; Μαύρη βύνη χωρίς πικράδα; Αποφλοιωμένη (τύπου Carafa); Αποφλοιωμένο καβουρδισμένο σιτάρι (τύπου midnight wheat); Ανοιχτόχρωμη βύνη σοκολάτας; Καβουρδισμένο κριθάρι (χωρίς βυνοποίηση); Καβουρδισμένη σίκαλη; Καβουρδισμένο σιτάρι; Άλλο
pt-BR: Malte torrado tipo de processamento: Malte black; Malte chocolate; Malte black sem amargor; Sem casca (estilo Carafa); Trigo torrado sem casca (estilo midnight wheat); Malte pale chocolate; Cevada torrada (não maltada); Centeio torrado; Trigo torrado; Outro
en: Roasted malt processing type: Black malt; Chocolate malt; Debittered black malt; Dehusked (Carafa-style); Dehusked roasted wheat (midnight wheat-style); Pale chocolate malt; Roasted barley (unmalted); Roasted rye; Roasted wheat; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta obrade prženog slada: Crni slad; Čokoladni slad; Crni slad bez gorčine; Bez ljuske (u stilu Carafa); Pržena pšenica bez ljuske (u stilu ponoćne pšenice); Svijetli čokoladni slad; Prženi ječam (neslađen); Pržena raž; Pržena pšenica; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de processamento do malte torrado: Malte preto; Malte de chocolate; Malte preto sem amargor; Descascado (estilo Carafa); Trigo torrado descascado (estilo midnight wheat); Malte de chocolate claro; Cevada torrada (não maltada); Centeio torrado; Trigo torrado; Outro
sk-SK: Typ spracovania praženého sladu: Čierny slad; Čokoládový slad; Odkyslený čierny slad (zbavený horkosti); Bez pluchy (typ Carafa); Bez pluchy pražená pšenica (typ midnight wheat); Svetlý čokoládový slad; Pražený jačmeň (nesladovaný); Pražená raž; Pražená pšenica; Iné
ro-RO: Tipul de procesare a malțului prăjit: Malț negru; Malț ciocolatiu; Malț negru fără amăreală; Decorticat (stil Carafa); Grâu prăjit decorticat (stil grâu midnight); Malț ciocolatiu pal; Orz prăjit (nemalțificat); Secară prăjită; Grâu prăjit; Altele
fi: Paahdetun maltaan jalostustyyppi: Mustamallas; Suklaamallas; Kitkeryydetön mustamallas; Kuorittu (Carafa-tyylinen); Kuorittu paahdettu vehnä (midnight wheat -tyylinen); Vaalea suklaamallas; Paahdettu ohra (mallastamaton); Paahdettu ruis; Paahdettu vehnä; Muu
vi: Loại chế biến mạch nha rang: Mạch nha đen; Mạch nha socola; Mạch nha đen khử đắng; Loại bỏ vỏ (Kiểu Carafa); Lúa mì rang bỏ vỏ (Kiểu midnight wheat); Mạch nha socola nhạt; Lúa mạch rang (không mạch nha); Lúa mạch đen rang; Lúa mì rang; Khác
tr: Kavrulmuş malt işleme türü: Siyah malt; Çikolatalı malt; Acılığı giderilmiş siyah malt; Kabuksuz (Carafa stili); Kabuksuz kavrulmuş buğday (gece yarısı buğday stili); Soluk çikolatalı malt; Kavrulmuş arpa (maltsız); Kavrulmuş çavdar; Kavrulmuş buğday; Diğer
zh-CN: 烘焙麦芽加工类型: 黑麦芽; 巧克力麦芽; 去苦黑麦芽; 去壳（卡拉法式）; 去壳烘焙小麦（午夜小麦式）; 淡色巧克力麦芽; 烘焙大麦（未发芽）; 烘焙黑麦; 烘焙小麦; 其他
ru: Тип обработки жареного солода: Черный солод; Шоколадный солод; Обесгорченный черный солод; Очищенный от шелухи (в стиле Carafa); Очищенная от шелухи жареная пшеница (в стиле Midnight Wheat); Светлый шоколадный солод; Жареный ячмень (несоложеный); Жареная рожь; Жареная пшеница; Другое
sv: Rostad maltbearbetningstyp: Svartmalt; Chokladmalt; Avbitterad svartmalt; Avskalad (Carafa-stil); Avskalat rostat vete (midnight wheat-stil); Ljus chokladmalt; Rostat korn (omältat); Rostad råg; Rostat vete; Övrigt
pl: Typ przetwarzania słodu palonego: Słód czarny; Słód czekoladowy; Słód czarny pozbawiony goryczki; Bezłuskowy (w stylu Carafa); Bezłuskowa palona pszenica (w stylu midnight wheat); Jasny słód czekoladowy; Palony jęczmień (niesłodowany); Palone żyto; Palona pszenica; Inne
lt-LT: Skrudinto salyklo apdorojimo tipas: Juodasis salyklas; Šokoladinis salyklas; Juodasis salyklas be kartumo; Be lukštų („Carafa“ stiliaus); Skrudinti kviečiai be lukštų („midnight wheat“ stiliaus); Šviesus šokoladinis salyklas; Skrudinti miežiai (nesalykliniai); Skrudinti rugiai; Skrudinti kviečiai; Kita
cs: Typ zpracování praženého sladu: Černý slad; Čokoládový slad; Odhořčený černý slad; Bezpluchý (typ Carafa); Bezpluchá pražená pšenice (typ midnight wheat); Světlý čokoládový slad; Pražený ječmen (nesladovaný); Pražené žito; Pražená pšenice; Jiné
it: Tipo di lavorazione del malto tostato: Malto nero; Malto chocolate; Malto nero decorticato; Decorticato (stile Carafa); Grano tostato decorticato (stile midnight wheat); Malto pale chocolate; Orzo tostato (non maltato); Segale tosta; Grano tostato; Altro
da: Forarbejdningstype for ristet malt: Sort malt; Chokolademalt; Afbitret sort malt; Afskallet (Carafa-stil); Afskallet ristet hvede (Midnight Wheat-stil); Lys chokolademalt; Ristet byg (umaltet); Ristet rug; Ristet hvede; Andet
bg-BG: Вид обработка на печен малц: Черен малц; Шоколадов малц; Обезгорчен черен малц; Обелен (тип Carafa); Обелена печена пшеница (тип midnight wheat); Светъл шоколадов малц; Печен ечемик (немалцуван); Печена ръж; Печена пшеница; Други
de: Verarbeitungsart von Röstmalz: Black Malt (Farbmalz); Schokoladenmalz; Entbittertes Farbmalz; Entspelzt (Carafa-Art); Entspelzter Röstweizen (Midnight-Wheat-Art); Pale Chocolate Malt; Röstgerste (ungemälzt); Röstroggen; Röstweizen; Sonstige
th: ประเภทการแปรรูปมอลต์คั่ว: มอลต์สีดำ; ช็อกโกแลตมอลต์; มอลต์สีดำสกัดความขมออก; กะเทาะเปลือก (สไตล์ Carafa); ข้าวสาลีคั่วกะเทาะเปลือก (สไตล์มิดไนต์วีต); เพลช็อกโกแลตมอลต์; บาร์เลย์คั่ว (ไม่ทำมอลต์); ไรย์คั่ว; ข้าวสาลีคั่ว; อื่นๆ
ja: ロースト麦芽加工タイプ: ブラックモルト; チョコレートモルト; デビタードブラックモルト; 脱殻 (カラファスタイル); 脱殻ローストウィート (ミッドナイトウィートスタイル); ペールチョコレートモルト; ローステッドバーレイ (非麦芽); ローステッドライ; ローステッドウィート; その他
zh-TW: 烘焙麥芽加工類型: 黑麥芽; 巧克力麥芽; 脫苦黑麥芽; 去殼 (Carafa 風格); 去殼烤小麥 (午夜小麥風格); 淡色巧克力麥芽; 烤大麥 (未發芽); 烤裸麥; 烤小麥; 其他
ko: 볶은 맥아 가공 유형: 블랙 몰트; 초콜릿 몰트; 디비터드 블랙 몰트; 탈각(카라파 스타일); 탈각 로스팅 밀(미드나잇 위트 스타일); 페일 초콜릿 몰트; 로스팅 보리(비발아); 로스팅 호밀; 로스팅 밀; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta predelave praženega slada: Črni slad; Čokoladni slad; Razgrenjen črni slad; Oluščeno (slog Carafa); Oluščena pražena pšenica (slog midnight wheat); Svetli čokoladni slad; Pražen ječmen (neslajen); Pražena rž; Pražena pšenica; Drugo
es: Tipo de procesamiento de malta tostada: Malta negra; Malta chocolate; Malta negra sin amargor; Sin cáscara (estilo Carafa); Trigo tostado sin cáscara (estilo trigo de medianoche); Malta chocolate pálida; Cebada tostada (sin maltear); Centeno tostado; Trigo tostado; Otro